Missouri, session 2026, HB3345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 217.267, to read as follows:
217.267. Beginning January 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, each member of
the general assembly shall be required to conduct at least four qualifying department of
corrections interactions per year, which shall qualify under one or both of the following
categories:
(1) In-person visits to any department of corrections facility in this state; or
(2) Communication with an inmate regarding any issue the inmate is
experiencing at a department of corrections facility, which shall include resolution of
such issue.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.